Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.685

Precollege coursework—Enrollment information—Report.

Beginning in 1997, by September 30th of each year, each state university, regional university, state college, and, for community colleges and technical colleges, the state board for community and technical colleges shall provide a report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the commission on student learning under *RCW 28A.630.885. The report shall contain the following information on students who, within three years of graduating from a Washington high school, enrolled the prior year in a state-supported precollege level class at the institution: (1) The number of such students enrolled in a precollege level class in mathematics, reading, grammar, spelling, writing, or English; (2) the types of precollege classes in which each student was enrolled; and (3) the name of the Washington high school from which each student graduated.

For students who enrolled in a precollege class within three years of graduating from a Washington high school, each institution of higher education shall also report to the Washington high school from which the student graduated. The annual report shall include information on the number of students from that high school enrolled in precollege classes, and the types of classes taken by the students.

[ 1995 c 310 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.630.885 was recodified as RCW 28A.655.060 pursuant to 1999 c 388 s 607. RCW 28A.655.060 was subsequently repealed by 2004 c 19 s 206.